Mississippi statutes. Title 9. Courts
Jurisdiction, Powers and Authority

§ 9-7-81.
Jurisdiction; general enumeration of subjects.

The circuit court shall have original jurisdiction in all actions when the principal of the amount in controversy exceeds two hundred dollars, and of all other actions and causes, matters and things arising under the constitution and laws of this state which are not exclusively cognizable in some other court, and such appellate jurisdiction as prescribed by law. Such court shall have power to hear and determine all prosecutions in the name of the state for treason, felonies, crimes, and misdemeanors, except such as may be exclusively cognizable before some other court; and said court shall have all the powers belonging to a court of oyer and terminer and general jail delivery, and may do and perform all other acts properly pertaining to a circuit court of law.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 61, art. 6 (5); 1857, ch. 61, art. 29; 1871, § 519; 1880, § 1493; 1892, § 645; 1906, § 702; Hemingway’s 1917, § 481; 1930, § 490; 1942, § 1428.

§ 9-7-83.
Jurisdiction of cases transferred or remanded to it.

The circuit court shall have jurisdiction of all cases transferred to it by the chancery court or remanded to it by the supreme court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 646; 1906, § 703; Hemingway’s 1917, § 482; 1930, § 491; 1942, § 1429.

§ 9-7-85.
Jurisdiction; suit for sum below.

If a suit shall be brought in the circuit court for a sum of less than the court can take cognizance of, or if a greater sum than is due shall be demanded, on purpose to confer jurisdiction, the complaint shall be involuntarily dismissed pursuant to the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure; and if the plaintiff, in any case, shall not recover more than the minimal jurisdictional amount, he shall not recover any costs of the defendant unless the judge shall be of the opinion, and so enter on the record, that the plaintiff had reasonable ground to expect to recover more than the minimal jurisdictional amount, or unless the court shall have jurisdiction of the cause, without respect to the amount in controversy.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 58, art. 1 (11); 1857, ch. 61, art. 33; 1871, § 666; 1880, § 1497; 1892, § 649; 1906, § 706; Hemingway’s 1917, § 485; 1930, § 494; 1942, § 1432; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 9-7-87.
Special terms; jurisdiction; juries for.

At a special term the circuit court may impanel grand and petit juries, and shall have jurisdiction to hear and determine all civil and criminal business, in the same manner as at a regular term.

Parties and witnesses shall be bound to attend; and witnesses duly subpoenaed or bound by recognizance, shall be subject to the same penalties for failure to attend as if such failure had occurred at a regular term. On receiving the order for a special term, if it be held because of a failure of a regular term, the proper officers shall open the envelopes containing the names of the jurors for such regular term, if it has not been done, and the venire facias shall issue and the jurors be summoned as required by law; but if there be no such envelopes, the jurors shall be drawn as provided in case of a failure of the judge to draw them. The judge may direct whether jurors shall be summoned and how they shall be drawn.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 53, art. 8 (2); 1857, ch. 61, art. 4; 1871, § 878; 1880, § 1482; 1892, § 630; 1906, § 688; Hemingway’s 1917, § 466; 1930, § 475; 1942, § 1413.

§ 9-7-89.
Motions against officers for money collected.

The circuit court shall hear and determine all motions against attorneys at law, sheriffs, coroners, and other officers, for money collected or received as such, and not paid over on demand to the party entitled to the same, and may give judgment and award execution thereon.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 53, art. 2 (164); 1857, ch. 61, art. 30; 1871, § 523; 1880, § 1494; 1892, § 647; 1906, § 704; Hemingway’s 1917, § 483; 1930, § 492; 1942, § 1430.

§ 9-7-91.
Judgments and executions.

The circuit court may render judgments according to the principles and usages of law, in all cases cognizable before it, and award executions, directed to the sheriff or other proper officer of any county. The court, upon legal conviction of a person of a crime or misdemeanor, shall proceed to judgment and award execution thereon as the law directs.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 61, art. 1 (147); 1857, ch. 61, art. 31; 1871, § 521; 1880, § 1495; 1892, § 648; 1906, § 705; Hemingway’s 1917, § 484; 1930, § 493; 1942, § 1431.

§ 9-7-93.
Time may be allotted by court for civil and criminal business separately.

In the county where it may be necessary, in the discretion of the court or judge, the court may designate a certain portion of the time allotted for the holding of court exclusively to the civil business and a certain portion of the time exclusively to the hearing of criminal business, and in cases where the court or judge does this, the court or judge shall so allot the time as to meet the necessities of the criminal and civil business, and, in all cases where it is practical to do so, the court or judge shall separate the civil and criminal business, so that certain time shall be devoted to each.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 468; 1930, § 477; 1942, § 1415; Laws, 1906, ch. 106.

§ 9-7-95.
Transfer for trial of cases filed in county courts in nineteenth district.

Cases filed in the county courts of any county in the nineteenth circuit court district, with the exception of equity and youth court cases, at the discretion of the county court judge, and with the consent of the circuit judge, may be transferred for trial to the circuit courts of such district, and the judgment rendered thereon on any such transferred case in the circuit court shall be a final judgment and shall be appealable in the same manner as now provided by law for appeals from final judgments rendered by circuit courts.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1411.7; Laws, 1962, ch. 296, §§ 1-8; Laws, 1964, ch. 318, §§ 1, 2, 4 (¶¶ 2, 4, 7); Laws, 1970, ch. 332, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 1970).